Louisiana, session 2026, HB356.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The elevated portion of Louisiana Highway 315, commonly referred to
as the Bayou Dularge Bascule Bridge, over the Gulf Intracoastal Waterway in Terrebonne
Parish, city of Houma, shall be known and is hereby designated as the "Elward T. Brady, Jr.
Memorial Bridge".
Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development or its contractors are
hereby directed to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting this designation
provided local or private monies are received by the department equal to the department's
actual costs for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to
exceed the sum of seven hundred fifty dollars per sign.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1